Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 51 School Bus Safety Enforcement

31-51-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “School Bus Safety Enforcement Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 118, § 1.

31-51-2.
Live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring systems.

All school departments of this state are hereby authorized to install and operate live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring systems. Such systems shall at a minimum, be systems which monitor and detect school bus traffic violations. For purposes of this chapter a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system means a system with one or more camera sensors and computers which produce live digital and recorded video of motor vehicles being operated in violation of school bus traffic laws. All systems installed for used under this chapter must, at a minimum, produce a live visual image viewable remotely, a recorded image of the license plate, and be able to record the time, date, and location of the vehicle, and a signed affidavit by a person who witnessed the violation via live video.

The school departments may enter into an agreement with a private corporation or other entity to provide live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring systems and to maintain and operate such systems.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 107, § 1.

31-51-2.1.
Installation and signage.

All vehicles installed with a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system shall post a warning sign indicating the use of such system.

Warning signage shall remain on each vehicle as long as a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system is in operation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 118, § 1.

31-51-2.2.
Stopping for school bus required — Penalty for violation.

Any vehicle being operated upon a street, highway, private way or private or public parking area upon meeting or overtaking from any direction any school bus on which there is in operation flashing red lights, shall stop before reaching the bus. The vehicle shall not proceed until the bus resumes motion or until the flashing lights are no longer actuated. An owner and/or operator of a motor vehicle operated in violation of this section based on evidence obtained from a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system shall, upon conviction of a violation of this section, be punished by a civil fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) and/or suspension of his or her driving license for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days.

A law enforcement officer authorized to issue a traffic violation summons pursuant to this title may issue a summons of a violation of this chapter based on evidence from a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system; provided, that the statement of testimony, or evidence provides the law enforcement officer with sufficient probable cause that a violation under this section was committed. The summons shall be in the form referred to in §

31-51-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 105, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 107, § 2.

31-51-3.
Procedure — Notice.

Except as expressly provided in this chapter, all prosecutions based on evidence produced by a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system shall follow the procedures established in chapter 41.1 of this title, chapter 18 of title 8 and the rules promulgated by the chief magistrate of the traffic tribunal for the hearing of civil traffic violations in the traffic tribunal. Provided, that in an action brought pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, references in chapter 41.1 of this title to an “operator” shall apply to the registered owner of the vehicle. A summons may be issued by an officer solely based on evidence obtained by use of a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system. All summonses issued based on evidence obtained from a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system shall be issued within ten (10) days of the violation. Notwithstanding any provisions of the general laws to the contrary, exclusive jurisdiction to hear and decide any violation under this chapter shall be with the traffic tribunal.

It shall be sufficient to commence a prosecution based on evidence obtained from a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system. A copy of the summons and supporting documentation shall be mailed to the address of the registered owner kept on file by the registry of motor vehicles. For purposes of this section, the date of issuance shall be the date of mailing.

The officer issuing the citation shall certify under penalties of perjury that the evidence obtained from the live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system was sufficient to demonstrate a violation of the motor vehicle code. Such certification shall be sufficient in all prosecutions pursuant to this chapter to justify the entry of a default judgment upon sufficient proof of actual notice in all cases where the citation is not answered within the time period permitted.

The summons shall contain all the information provided for on the uniform summons as referred to in §

31-41.1-1

and the rules of procedure promulgated by the chief magistrate of the traffic tribunal as well as the date, time, and location of the violation. In addition, the following information shall be attached to or accompany the summons:

Copies of two (2) or more photographs, or microphotographs, videos, or other recorded images taken as proof of the violation;

A signed statement certified under the penalties of perjury by a trained law enforcement officer that, based on inspection of recorded images and video, the motor vehicle was being operated in violation of this chapter;

A signed statement that recorded images are evidence of a violation of this chapter;

A statement that the person who receives the summons under this chapter may either pay the civil fine in accordance with the provisions of §

31-51-2.2

, proceed under § 31-51-5(c)(3) of this section, or elect to stand trial for the alleged violation;

A signed affidavit by a person who witnessed the motor vehicle being operated in violation of this chapter; and

A signed statement certified under the penalties of perjury by a trained law enforcement officer that the summons and attachments required under this subsection were mailed to the address of the registered owner kept on file by the registry of motor vehicles.

Any summons issued pursuant to this chapter shall be issued by a law enforcement officer authorized to issue a traffic violation summons pursuant to this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 33; P.L. 2011, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 107, § 1.

31-51-4.
Hearings.

Evidence from a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system shall be considered substantive evidence in the prosecution of all civil traffic violations. Evidence from a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system approved by the school department shall be admitted without further authentication and such evidence may be deemed sufficient to sustain a civil traffic violation. In addition to any other defenses as set forth herein, any and all defenses cognizable at law shall be available to the individual who receives the citation commencing a prosecution under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 118, § 1.

31-51-5.
Driver/registered owner liability.

The registered owner of a motor vehicle shall not operate or allow the motor vehicle to be operated in violation of this chapter. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the registered owner of the vehicle that is photographed pursuant to this chapter was operating the vehicle.

In all prosecutions of civil traffic violations based on evidence obtained from a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system as provided under this chapter, the registered owner of the vehicle shall be primarily responsible in all prosecutions of violations pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, except as otherwise provided under this chapter.

In the event that the registered owner of the vehicle operated in violation of this chapter was not the operator of the vehicle at the time of the violation, the registered owner shall either:

Accept responsibility for the violation by paying the fine; or

Upon receipt of the notice of the violation, provide the issuing authority, within twenty (20) days of the date of issuance, the name and address of the individual operating the vehicle at the time which the violation occurred.

It shall be prima facie evidence, establishing a rebuttable presumption, that the owner of the registered motor vehicle was the operator of the vehicle at the time of the violation if the registered owner of the motor vehicle fails to pay the fine and fails to proceed under subdivision (c)(2) of this section. Evidence offered pursuant to this chapter shall be sufficient to establish a violation of §

31-51-2.2

by clear and convincing evidence.

The owner of a rented or leased motor vehicle may establish non-liability for violations issued pursuant to this chapter by providing to the issuing authority a copy of the written rental or a lease agreement which shall be prima facie evidence, establishing a rebuttable presumption, that the lessee was the operator of the vehicle. In the event that the lessee was not the operator of the motor vehicle at the time of the violation, the lessee shall either:

Accept responsibility for the violation by paying the fine; or

Upon receipt of the notice of the violation, provide the issuing authority within twenty (20) days of the date of issuance, the name and address of the individual operating the vehicle at the time which the violation occurred.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 107, § 1.

31-51-5.1.
Revenue.

The revenue generated from each fine imposed pursuant to this chapter shall be allocated as follows:

Seventy-five percent (75%) to the vendor;

Twelve and one-half percent (12.5%) to the state general fund; and

Twelve and one-half percent (12.5%) to the municipality where the violation takes place.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 105, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 107, § 2.

31-51-6.
Use of evidence in criminal and civil cases.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the use of evidence produced by a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system in a criminal or private civil proceeding provided that the admissibility of such evidence shall not follow the applicable laws and rules of procedure and rules of evidence which apply in criminal and civil cases.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 118, § 1.

31-51-7.
Nature of violations.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

No violation for which a civil fine is imposed under this chapter shall be considered a moving violation, nor shall be included on the driving record of the person on whom the liability is imposed, nor shall it be used for insurance rating purposes in providing motor vehicle insurance coverage.

Impositions of a penalty pursuant to this chapter shall not be deemed a criminal conviction of an owner or operator;

The “good driving record” provision of §

31-41.1-7

shall not be used to dismiss an action brought pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 107, § 1.

31-51-8.
Security of records.

The recorded images and live video produced by a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system shall not be deemed “public records” subject to disclosure pursuant to subdivision 38-2-2(4)(i).

All recorded images and live video that do not identify a violation shall be destroyed within twenty-four (24) hours of the date the live video was recorded, unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.

All recorded images and live video that identify a violation shall be destroyed within one year after the citation is resolved by administrative payment, trial or other final disposition of the citation, unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.

The privacy of records produced pursuant to this chapter shall be maintained; provided, that aggregate data not containing personal identifying information may be released.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 118, § 1.

31-51-9.
Reports.

The school department authorizing the installation of a live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system shall prepare an annual report containing data on:

The number of citations issued;

The number of those violations paid;

The number of those violations found after trial or hearing;

The number of violations dismissed after trial or hearing;

The amount of revenue obtained from the live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring system.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 33.